Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 4. Reporting Requirements; Disclosures.

§ 2961.
Submission of reports to the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall provide on the online database set forth in section 2906 of this chapter digital access to the form that he or she provides for any report required by this chapter. Digital access shall enable any person required to file a report under this chapter to file the report by completing and submitting the report to the Secretary of State online.
(a) (1) The Secretary of State shall provide on the online database set forth in section 2906 of this chapter digital access to the form that he or she provides for any report required by this chapter. Digital access shall enable any person required to file a report under this chapter to file the report by completing and submitting the report to the Secretary of State online.

The Secretary of State shall maintain on the online database all reports that have been filed digitally on it so that any person may have direct machine-readable electronic access to the individual data elements in each report and the ability to search those data elements as soon as a report is filed.

Any person required to file a report with the Secretary of State under this chapter shall file the report digitally on the online database.

Notwithstanding the definition of “file” set forth in section 2103 of this title, such a report is required to be filed on or before the day provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 15, 2015; amended

2015, No. 30

, § 32, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 2962.
Reports; general provisions.

Any report required to be submitted to the Secretary of State under this chapter shall contain the statement “I hereby certify that the information provided on all pages of this campaign finance disclosure report is true to the best of my knowledge, information, and belief” and places for the signature of the candidate or the treasurer of the candidate, political committee, or political party.

Any person required to file a report under this chapter shall provide the information required in the Secretary of State’s reporting form. Disclosure shall be limited to the information required to administer this chapter.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014; amended

2015, No. 30

, § 33, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 2963.
Campaign reports; Secretary of State; forms; filing.

The Secretary of State shall prescribe and provide a uniform reporting form for all campaign finance reports. The reporting form shall be designed to show the following information:

the full name, town of residence, and mailing address of each contributor who contributes an amount in excess of $100.00, the date of the contribution, and the amount contributed;

the total amount of all contributions of $100.00 or less and the total number of all contributors making such contributions;

each expenditure listed by amount, date, to whom paid, for what purpose; and

if the expenditure was a related campaign expenditure made on a candidate’s behalf:

the name of the candidate or candidates on whose behalf the expenditure was made; and

the name of any other candidate or candidates who were otherwise supported or opposed by the expenditure; or

if the expenditure was not a related campaign expenditure made on a candidate’s behalf but was made to support or oppose a candidate or candidates, the name of the candidate or candidates;

the amount contributed or loaned by the candidate to his or her own campaign during the reporting period; and

each debt or other obligation, listed by amount, date incurred, to whom owed, and for what purpose, incurred during the reporting period.

The form shall require the reporting of all contributions and expenditures accepted or spent during the reporting period and during the campaign to date and shall require full disclosure of the manner in which any indebtedness is discharged or forgiven.
(b) (1) The form shall require the reporting of all contributions and expenditures accepted or spent during the reporting period and during the campaign to date and shall require full disclosure of the manner in which any indebtedness is discharged or forgiven.

Contributions and expenditures for the reporting period and for the campaign to date also shall be totaled in an appropriate place on the form. The total of contributions shall include a subtotal of nonmonetary contributions and a subtotal of all monetary contributions.

The form shall contain a list of the required filing times so that the person filing may designate for which time period the filing is made.

Contributions accepted and expenditures spent after 5:00 p.m. on the third day prior to the filing deadline shall be reported on the next report.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014; amended

2015, No. 30

, § 34, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 2964.
Campaign reports; candidates for State office, the General Assembly, and county office; political committees; political parties.

Each candidate for State office, the General Assembly, or a two-year-term county office who has rolled over any amount of surplus into his or her new campaign or who has made expenditures or accepted contributions of $500.00 or more during the two-year general election cycle and, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, each political committee that has not filed a final report pursuant to subsection 2965(b) of this chapter, and each political party required to register under section 2923 of this chapter shall file with the Secretary of State campaign finance reports as follows:
(a) (1) Each candidate for State office, the General Assembly, or a two-year-term county office who has rolled over any amount of surplus into his or her new campaign or who has made expenditures or accepted contributions of $500.00 or more during the two-year general election cycle and, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, each political committee that has not filed a final report pursuant to subsection 2965(b) of this chapter, and each political party required to register under section 2923 of this chapter shall file with the Secretary of State campaign finance reports as follows:

in the first year of the two-year general election cycle, on July 1; and

in the second year of the two-year general election cycle:

on March 15;

on July 1 and August 1;

on September 1;

on October 1, October 15, and the Friday before the general election; and

two weeks after the general election.

Each candidate for a four-year-term county office who has rolled over any amount of surplus into his or her new campaign or who has made expenditures or accepted contributions of $500.00 or more during the four-year general election cycle shall file with the Secretary of State campaign finance reports as follows:

in the first three years of the four-year general election cycle, on July 1; and

in the fourth year of the four-year general election cycle:

on March 15;

on July 1 and August 1;

on September 1;

on October 1, October 15, and the Friday before the general election; and

two weeks after the general election.

A political committee or a political party that has accepted contributions or made expenditures of $1,000.00 or more during the local election cycle for the purpose of influencing a local election or supporting or opposing one or more candidates in a local election shall file with the Secretary of State campaign finance reports regarding that local election 30 days before, 10 days before, and two weeks after the local election.
(b) (1) A political committee or a political party that has accepted contributions or made expenditures of $1,000.00 or more during the local election cycle for the purpose of influencing a local election or supporting or opposing one or more candidates in a local election shall file with the Secretary of State campaign finance reports regarding that local election 30 days before, 10 days before, and two weeks after the local election.

As used in this subsection, “local election cycle” means:

in the case of a local election, the period that begins 38 days after the local election prior to the one for which the contributions or expenditures were made and ends 38 days after the local election for which the contributions or expenditures were made, and includes any primary or run-off election related to that local election; or

in the case of a special local election, the period that begins on the date the special local election was ordered and ends 38 days after that special local election, and includes any special primary or run-off election related to that special local election.

The failure of a candidate, political committee, or political party to file a report under this section shall be deemed an affirmative statement that a report is not required of the candidate, political committee, or political party under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014; amended

2015, No. 30

, § 35, eff. May 26, 2015;

2019, No. 67

, § 22, eff. June 17, 2019.

§ 2965.
Final reports; candidates for State office, the General Assembly, and county office; political committees; political parties; end-of-cycle reports for political committees and political parties.

At any time, but not later than December 15 following the general election, each candidate required to report under the provisions of section 2964 of this subchapter shall file with the Secretary of State a “final report” that lists a complete accounting of all contributions and expenditures since the last report and liquidation of surplus and that shall constitute the termination of his or her campaign activities.

At any time, but not later than December 15 following the general election, each political committee or political party that has not filed a final report as set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall file an end-of-cycle report that lists a complete accounting of all contributions and expenditures since the last report.
(b) (1) At any time, but not later than December 15 following the general election, each political committee or political party that has not filed a final report as set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall file an end-of-cycle report that lists a complete accounting of all contributions and expenditures since the last report.

At any time, a political committee or a political party may file a “final report” that lists a complete accounting of all contributions and expenditures since the last report and liquidation of surplus and that shall constitute the termination of its campaign activities.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014; amended

2015, No. 30

, § 36, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 2966.
Reports by candidates not reaching monetary reporting threshold.

Each candidate for State office, the General Assembly, or a two-year-term county office who was not required to report under the provisions of section 2964 of this subchapter shall file with the Secretary of State 10 days following the general election a statement that the candidate either did not roll over any amount of surplus into his or her new campaign or has not made expenditures or accepted contributions of $500.00 or more during the two-year general election cycle.

Each candidate for a four-year-term county office who was not required to report under the provisions of section 2964 of this subchapter shall file with the Secretary of State 10 days following the general election a statement that the candidate either did not roll over any amount of surplus into his or her new campaign or has not made expenditures or accepted contributions of $500.00 or more during the four-year general election cycle.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2967.
Additional campaign reports; candidates for State office and the General Assembly.

In addition to any other reports required to be filed under this chapter, a candidate for State office or for the General Assembly who accepts a monetary contribution in an amount over $2,000.00 within 10 days of a primary or general election shall report the contribution to the Secretary of State within 24 hours of receiving the contribution.

A report required by this section shall include the following information:

the full name, town of residence, and mailing address of the contributor; the date of the contribution; and the amount contributed; and

the amount contributed or loaned by the candidate to his or her own campaign.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2968.
Campaign reports; local candidates.

Each candidate for local office who has rolled over any amount of surplus into his or her new campaign or who has made expenditures or accepted contributions of $500.00 or more since the last local election for that office shall file with the Secretary of State campaign finance reports 30 days before, 10 days before, four days before, and two weeks after the local election.

Within 40 days after the local election, each candidate for local office required to report under the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall file with the Secretary of State a “final report” that lists a complete accounting of all contributions and expenditures since the last report and a liquidation of surplus and which shall constitute the termination of his or her campaign activities.

The failure of a local candidate to file a campaign finance report under this section shall be deemed an affirmative statement that the candidate either did not roll over any amount of surplus into his or her new campaign or has not accepted contributions or made expenditures of $500.00 or more since the last local election for that office.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014; amended

2017, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Dec. 14, 2018.

§ 2969.
Reporting of surplus maintenance by former candidates.

A former candidate who has maintained surplus by carrying it forward as provided in subdivision 2924(d)(1)(B) of this chapter but who is not otherwise required to file campaign reports under this chapter shall file a report of the amount of his or her surplus and any liquidation of it two weeks after each general election until liquidation of all surplus has been reported.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2970.
Campaign reports; other entities; public questions.

Any formal or informal committee of two or more individuals or a corporation, labor organization, public interest group, or other entity, not including a political party, that makes expenditures of $1,000.00 or more during the election cycle for the purpose of advocating a position on a public question in any election shall file a report of its expenditures 30 days before, 10 days before, and two weeks after the election with the Secretary of State.

As used in this section, “election cycle” means:

in the case of a public question in a general or local election, the period that begins 38 days after the general or local election prior to the one in which the public question is posed and ends 38 days after the general or local election in which the public question is posed; or

in the case of a public question in a special election, the period that begins on the date the special election for the public question was ordered and ends 38 days after that special election.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2971.
Report of mass media activities.

In addition to any other reports required to be filed under this chapter, a person who makes expenditures for any one mass media activity totaling $500.00 or more, adjusted for inflation pursuant to the Consumer Price Index as provided in section 2905 of this chapter, within 45 days before a primary, general, county, or local election shall, for each activity, file a mass media report with the Secretary of State and send a copy of the report to each candidate whose name or likeness is included in the activity without that candidate’s knowledge.
(a) (1) In addition to any other reports required to be filed under this chapter, a person who makes expenditures for any one mass media activity totaling $500.00 or more, adjusted for inflation pursuant to the Consumer Price Index as provided in section 2905 of this chapter, within 45 days before a primary, general, county, or local election shall, for each activity, file a mass media report with the Secretary of State and send a copy of the report to each candidate whose name or likeness is included in the activity without that candidate’s knowledge.

The copy of the mass media report shall be sent by e-mail to each such candidate who has provided the Secretary of State with an e-mail address on his or her consent form and to any other such candidate by mail.

The mass media report shall be filed and the copy of the report shall be sent within 24 hours of the expenditure or activity, whichever occurs first. For the purposes of this section, a person shall be treated as having made an expenditure if the person has executed a contract to make the expenditure.

The report shall identify the person who made the expenditure; the name of each candidate whose name or likeness was included in the activity; the amount and date of the expenditure; to whom it was paid; and the purpose of the expenditure.

If the activity occurs within 45 days before the election and the expenditure was previously reported, an additional report shall be required under this section.

(d) (1)

The copy of the mass media report shall be sent by e-mail to each such candidate who has provided the Secretary of State with an e-mail address on his or her consent form and to any other such candidate by mail.

The report shall include all of the information required under subsection (b) of this section, as well as the names of the contributors, dates, and amounts for all contributions in excess of $100.00 accepted since the filing of the committee’s last report.

(d)

Subsection (d) as amended by

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; see also subsection (d) as enacted by

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3 set out above and contingent effective date note set out below.

[Repealed.]

Subsection (d) as enacted by 2013, No. 90 (Adj. Sess.), § 3 and amended by

2015, No. 30

, § 37; see also subsection (d) as amended by 2013, No. 90 (Adj. Sess.), § 4 and contingent effective date note set out below.

In addition to the reporting requirements of this section, an independent expenditure-only political committee that makes an expenditure for any one mass media activity totaling $5,000.00 or more, adjusted for inflation pursuant to the Consumer Price Index as provided in section 2905 of this chapter, within 45 days before a primary, general, county, or local election shall, for each such activity and within 24 hours of the expenditure or activity, whichever occurs first, file an independent expenditure-only political committee mass media report with the Secretary of State and send a copy of the report to each candidate whose name or likeness is included in the activity without that candidate’s knowledge.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014; amended

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, cont. eff;

2015, No. 30

, § 37, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 2972.
Identification in electioneering communications.

An electioneering communication shall contain the name and mailing address of the person, candidate, political committee, or political party that paid for the communication. The name and address shall appear prominently and in a manner such that a reasonable person would clearly understand by whom the expenditure has been made, except that:

An audio electioneering communication paid for by a candidate does not need to contain the candidate’s address.

An electioneering communication paid for by a person acting as an agent or consultant on behalf of another person, candidate, political committee, or political party shall clearly designate the name and mailing address of the person, candidate, political committee, or political party on whose behalf the communication is published or broadcast.

If an electioneering communication is a related campaign expenditure made on a candidate’s behalf as provided in section 2944 of this chapter, then in addition to other requirements of this section, the communication shall also clearly designate the candidate on whose behalf it was made by including language such as “on behalf of” such candidate.

In addition to the identification requirements in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, an electioneering communication paid for by or on behalf of a political committee or political party shall contain the name of any contributor who contributed more than 25 percent of all contributions and more than $2,000.00 to that committee or party since the beginning of the two-year general election cycle in which the electioneering communication was made to the date on which the expenditure for the electioneering communication was made.
(c) (1) In addition to the identification requirements in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, an electioneering communication paid for by or on behalf of a political committee or political party shall contain the name of any contributor who contributed more than 25 percent of all contributions and more than $2,000.00 to that committee or party since the beginning of the two-year general election cycle in which the electioneering communication was made to the date on which the expenditure for the electioneering communication was made.

For the purposes of this subsection, a political committee or political party shall be treated as having made an expenditure if the committee or party or person acting on behalf of the committee or party has executed a contract to make the expenditure.

If it is not practicable to meet the identification requirements of this section within an electioneering communication that is broadcast over the Internet, such an electioneering communication shall contain a link that shall be clear and conspicuous and that, if clicked, takes the reader to a web page or social media page that provides all of the identification information as required by this section.

The identification requirements of this section shall not apply to lapel stickers or buttons, nor shall they apply to electioneering communications made by a single individual acting alone who spends, in a single two-year general election cycle, a cumulative amount of not more than $150.00 on those electioneering communications, adjusted for inflation pursuant to the Consumer Price Index as provided in section 2905 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014; amended

2017, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 16, 2018.

§ 2973.
Specific identification requirements for radio, television, or Internet communications.

In addition to the identification requirements set forth in section 2972 of this subchapter, a person, candidate, political committee, or political party that makes an expenditure for an electioneering communication shall include in any communication that is transmitted through radio, television, or online video, in a clearly spoken manner, an audio statement of the name and title of the person who paid for the communication and that the person paid for the communication.

If the person who paid for the communication is not an individual, the audio statement required by this section shall include the name of that person and the name and title of the treasurer in the case of a political committee or political party or the principal officer in the case of any other person that is not an individual.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014; amended

2017, No. 50

, § 66;

2017, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 16, 2018.